Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2776.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ALL SQUARE OF MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to All Square of Minnesota. The grant must be used to support the operations of All Square's workforce development programs that operate in the cities of Minneapolis and St. Paul and correctional facilities in the surrounding area to assist Minnesotans who are incarcerated, formerly incarcerated, or directly impacted by the existence of a criminal record in overcoming employment barriers that prevent economic and emotional freedom. Grant proceeds may be used for any or all of the following All Square programs: (1) the Restaurant and Food Truck Fellowship program; (2) the Prison to Law Pipeline program; or (3) the Legal Revolution Law Firm. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end